Utah statutes.
34A-7-202.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Division" means the Division of Boiler and Elevator Safety within the
commission.
(2) (a)  "Elevator" means a hoisting and lowering mechanism:
(i)  equipped with a car or platform; and
(ii)  that moves in guides in a substantially vertical direction.
(b)  "Elevator" does not mean:
(i)  a device used for the sole purpose of elevating or lowering materials
such as:
(A)  a dumbwaiter;
(B)  a conveyor; or
(C)  a chain, bucket, or construction hoist;
(ii)  a tiering, piling, feeding, or similar machine giving service within
only one story;
(iii)  a portable platform;
(iv)  a stage lift;
(v)  a device installed in a single family dwelling;
(vi)  a device installed in a facility owned and operated by the federal
government; or
(vii)  an amusement ride, as defined in Section 78B-4-507.
(3) (a)  "Escalator" means a stairway, moving walkway, or runway that is:
(i)  power-driven;
(ii)  continuous; and
(iii)  used to transport one or more individuals.
(b)  "Escalator" does not mean:
(i)  a device used for the sole purpose of elevating or lowering materials
such as:
(A)  a dumbwaiter;
(B)  a conveyor; or
(C)  a chain, bucket, or construction hoist;
(ii)  a device installed in a single-family dwelling;
(iii)  a device installed in a facility owned and operated by the federal
government; or
(iv)  an amusement ride, as defined in Section 78B-4-507.
(4)  "Owner or operator" means a person who owns, controls, or has the duty to
control the operation of an elevator or escalator.
(5)  "Safety code" means the one or more codes adopted by the division in
accordance with Subsection 34A-7-203(6) to be used in inspecting elevators and
escalators.
